Florida, session 2026, HB813.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2), paragraph (c) of subsection
(4), and subsection (6) of section 112.1816, Florida Statutes,
are amended to read:
112.1816 Firefighters; cancer diagnosis.—
(2) Upon a diagnosis of cancer, a firefighter is entitled
to the following benefits, as an alternative to pursuing
workers' compensation benefits under chapter 440, if the
firefighter has been employed by his or her employer for at
least 5 continuous years, has not used tobacco products for at
least the preceding 5 years, and has not been employed in any
other position in the preceding 5 years which is proven to
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb813-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 813 2026
create a higher risk for any cancer:
(a) Cancer treatment covered within an employer-sponsored
health plan or through a group health insurance trust fund. The
employer must timely reimburse the firefighter for any out-of-
pocket deductible, copayment, or coinsurance costs incurred due
to the treatment of cancer. If the firefighter elects to
continue coverage in the employer-sponsored health plan or group
health insurance trust fund after he or she terminates
employment, such benefits must be made available by his or her
former employer for 10 years after the date on which the
firefighter terminated employment so long as the firefighter
otherwise met the criteria specified in this subsection when he
or she terminated employment and was not employed as a
firefighter after that date.
(b) A one-time cash payout of $25,000, upon the
firefighter's initial diagnosis of cancer. Such benefit must be
made available by his or her former employer for 10 years after
the date on which the firefighter terminates employment so long
as the firefighter otherwise met the criteria specified in this
subsection when he or she terminated employment and was not
employed as a firefighter after that date.
(c) Leave time and employee retention benefits equivalent
to those provided for other injuries or illnesses incurred in
the line of duty.

Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb813-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 813 2026
If the firefighter elects to continue coverage in the employer-
sponsored health plan or group health insurance trust fund after
he or she terminates employment, the benefits specified in
paragraphs (a) and (b) must be made available by the former
employer of a firefighter for 10 years following the date on
which the firefighter terminates employment so long as the
firefighter otherwise met the criteria specified in this
subsection when he or she terminated employment and was not
subsequently employed as a firefighter following that date.
(4)
(c) Firefighters who die as a result of cancer or
circumstances that arise out of the treatment of cancer are
considered to have died in the manner as described in s.
112.191(2)(a), and all of the benefits arising out of such death
are available to the deceased firefighter's beneficiary. Such
death benefits must be made available by the former employer of
the firefighter for 1 year after the date on which the
firefighter terminated employment so long as the firefighter
otherwise met the criteria specified in this subsection when he
or she terminated employment and was not employed as a
firefighter after that date.
(6) The Division of State Fire Marshal within the
Department of Financial Services shall adopt rules to establish
employer cancer prevention best practices as it relates to
personal protective equipment, decontamination, fire suppression
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb813-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 813 2026
apparatus, and fire stations.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb813-00